Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-808
Obscene literature and material; sale to minor, unlawful; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for a person knowingly to sell, deliver, distribute, display for sale, or provide to a minor or knowingly to possess with intent to sell, deliver, distribute, display for sale, or provide to a minor:

(a) Any picture, photograph, drawing, sculpture, motion picture film, or similar visual representation or image of a person or portion of the human body or any replica, article, or device having the appearance of either male or female genitals which predominantly pruriently, shamefully, or morbidly depicts nudity, sexual conduct, sexual excitement, or sadomasochistic abuse and which, taken as a whole, is harmful to minors; or

(b) Any book, pamphlet, magazine, printed matter however produced, or sound recording which contains any matter enumerated in subdivision (1)(a) of this section or explicit and detailed verbal descriptions or narrative accounts of sexual excitement, sexual conduct, or sadomasochistic abuse of a predominantly prurient, shameful, or morbid nature and which, taken as a whole, is harmful to minors.

(2) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 164;

Laws 1988, LB 117, § 2.